Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1248.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:

SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified

in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 3242.4 of Title 70, unless there

is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:

A. An individual who is not lawfully present in the United

States shall not be eligible to enroll in an institution of higher

education within The Oklahoma State System of Higher Education.

B. The Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education shall

promulgate rules to implement the provisions of this section.

SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.

SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation

of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby



Req. No. 2212 Page 1

decl ared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and

be in full force from and after its passage and approval.



60-2-2212 EB 12/15/2025 3:47:20 PM









































Req. No. 2212 Page 2